Nevada, session 83, SB440.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 1-12. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 13. Chapter 116 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 13.3 and 13.7 of this act.
Sec. 13.3. 1. A unit’s owner in an association whose
governing documents authorize the association to impose
restrictions on architectural improvements who wishes to install a
distributed generation system within such physical portion of the
common-interest community as that owner has a right to occupy
and use exclusively may submit a request to the association in
accordance with any applicable procedures set forth in the
governing documents of the association. The unit’s owner shall
not install the distributed generation system unless the association
has approved the request.
2. An association that has adopted rules and regulations
governing the installation of a distributed generation system
pursuant to section 13.7 of this act shall approve or deny the
request within 35 days after the receipt of the request. If the
association denies the request, the association shall provide
the unit’s owner a notice that details the reasons for the denial,
which must be based on the rules and regulations adopted by the
association pursuant to section 13.7 of this act. If the association
fails to approve or deny the request within 35 days after the receipt
of the request, the request shall be deemed to be approved.
3. If a unit’s owner whose request to install a distributed
generation system was denied pursuant to subsection 2
subsequently resubmits the request and addresses the reasons for
the denial of the initial request, the association shall approve or
deny the request within 15 days after the receipt of the request. If
the association denies the request, the association shall provide the
unit’s owner notice that details the reasons for the denial, which
must be based on the rules and regulations adopted by the
association pursuant to section 13.7 of this act. If the association
fails to approve or deny the request within 15 days after the receipt
of the request, the request shall be deemed to be approved.
4. An association that has not adopted rules and regulations
governing the installation of a distributed generation system
pursuant to section 13.7 of this act that receives a request
submitted pursuant to subsection 1 shall approve the request
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
within 15 days after the receipt of the request. The association
shall not deny the request or impose any conditions upon the
installation of the distributed generation system.
5. If an association has adopted rules and regulations
governing the installation of a distributed generation system
pursuant to section 13.7 of this act, the association and each unit’s
owner shall comply with the rules and regulations.
6. As used in this section, “distributed generation system” has
the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 598.9804.
Sec. 13.7. 1. An association whose governing documents
authorize the association to impose restrictions on architectural
improvements may adopt rules and regulations governing the
installation of distributed generation systems that comply with the
provisions of this section.
2. If an association adopts rules and regulations governing
the installation of distributed generation systems pursuant to
subsection 1, the rules and regulations must:
(a) Not conflict with the provisions of the National Electric
Code, any local ordinance or any state law or regulation. The
provisions of the rules and regulations do not apply to the extent
of any such conflict.
(b) Require the solar installation company that will install the
distributed generation system to be properly licensed.
(c) Not require a unit’s owner to comply with any provision of
the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to paragraphs (a) and
(b) of subsection 3 if the costs of complying with the provision
exceeds 3 percent of the cash cost of the installation of the
distributed generation system. A unit’s owner may demonstrate
that the costs of complying with the provision exceed 3 percent of
the cash cost of the installation of the distributed generation
system by delivering to the association a written estimate that:
(1) Is prepared by a solar installation company that is
properly licensed pursuant to chapter 624 of NRS and is not
affiliated with either the unit’s owner or the association;
(2) Is dated not more than 60 days before delivery of the
written estimate to the association;
(3) Itemizes all costs of complying with the provision,
including, without limitation, labor, materials, professional fees,
permit fees, inspection fees, financing charges and the costs of
change orders; and
(4) Shows that the costs of complying with the provision
exceed 3 percent of the contract price for the installation of the
distributed generation system.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
3. Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (a) and (c) of
subsection 2, in addition to the requirements set forth in
subsection 2, if an association adopts rules and regulations
governing the installation of a distributed generation system
pursuant to subsection 1, the rules and regulations may require a
unit’s owner to:
(a) Install the solar panels of the distributed generation system
in a manner so that they do not face a street, so long as complying
with this requirement does not result in a decrease in the
production of the distributed generation system of more than 10
percent, as determined using the PVWatts Calculator maintained
by the National Renewable Energy Laboratory of the United
States Department of Energy.
(b) Paint all conduits of the distributed generation system to
match the exterior of the unit to which the system is affixed.
(c) Store all batteries for the distributed generation system in a
garage.
(d) Place all inverters of the distributed generation system
outside of any street and reasonably out of view of other unit’s
owners.
(e) If the distributed generation system will be installed on a
roof or other exterior portion of a unit for which the association is
responsible for the maintenance, repair or replacement, enter into
an agreement with the association setting forth the respective
rights and obligations of the unit’s owner and the association with
respect to the distributed generation system. The association may
require the agreement to be recorded and to include provisions in
the agreement which:
(1) Provide that the unit’s owner is solely responsible for
any damage caused to the roof or exterior portion that is caused by
the installation, maintenance, repair or replacement of the
distributed generation system.
(2) Require the unit’s owner, at his or her expense, to
remove the distributed generation system from the roof or exterior
portion if the association determines such action to be necessary
for the maintenance, repair or replacement of the roof or exterior
portion.
(3) Authorize the association to cause the distributed
generation system to be removed from the roof or exterior portion
if, after reasonable notice has been provided to the unit’s owner,
the unit’s owner fails to remove the distributed generation system
as required pursuant to subparagraph (2) and assess the costs of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
the removal, relocation, storage and replacement against the
unit’s owner.
(4) Require the unit’s owner to install the distributed
generation system in accordance with the terms of the request
submitted by the unit’s owner to the association and approved by
the association.
(5) Require the unit’s owner to maintain a policy of
insurance that names the association as an additional insured and
provides coverage for any losses or damages caused by the
installation, maintenance, repair or replacement of the distributed
generation system.
(6) Require the unit’s owner to indemnify the association
and its agents from any and all liability, claims, damages and
costs, including, without limitation, attorney’s fees, resulting from
the installation, maintenance, repair or replacement of the
distributed generation system.
(7) Provide the association the right to inspect the condition
of the distributed generation system.
(8) Require the unit’s owner to disclose to potential
purchasers of the unit all rights and responsibilities concerning
the distributed generation system.
4. An association may not:
(a) Unreasonably restrict, prohibit or withhold approval for a
unit’s owner to install any type of physical barrier around the
distributed generation system to deter the intrusion of animals or
to hide components of the system for aesthetic purposes; or
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, require the
installation of a particular type of physical barrier described in
paragraph (a). The association may require such a physical
barrier to be a particular color if the color is commercially
available as a stock item, rather than an item requiring
specialization or customization. If the color is not so available, the
association may require the physical barrier to be black or a color
complementary to the solar panels or racking system of the
distributed generation system.
5. As used in this section, “distributed generation system” has
the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 598.9804.
Sec. 14. Chapter 598 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 14.1 to 14.4, inclusive, of
this act.
Sec. 14.1. “Borrower” means a person who receives a
distributed generation system loan from a distributed generation
system financier.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
Sec. 14.2. “Distributed generation system financier” means a
person who:
1. Provides a distributed generation system loan to a
borrower in this State;
2. Leases a distributed generation system or any part thereof
to a lessee in this State; or
3. Contracts for a power purchase agreement with a host
customer in this State.
 The term does not include a third party who is a passive
investor or a tax equity partner of a distributed generation system
financier that provides money to the distributed generation system
financier and who is not directly involved in the sale or lease of or
the contracting for a distributed generation system.
Sec. 14.3. “Distributed generation system loan” means a
loan made for the express purpose of financing the purchase of a
distributed generation system or any part thereof.
Sec. 14.4. If a host customer enters into a power purchase
agreement and, at the time the agreement is signed, the solar
installation company that is a party to the agreement is not
properly licensed pursuant to chapter 624 of NRS or acting within
the monetary limit of the license, the power purchase agreement is
voidable by the host customer for 3 years after the date on which
the power purchase agreement is signed.
Sec. 14.5. NRS 598.9801 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
598.9801 As used in NRS 598.9801 to 598.9822, inclusive,
and sections 14.1 to 14.4, inclusive, of this act, unless the context
otherwise requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 598.9802 to
598.9808, inclusive, and sections 14.1, 14.2 and 14.3 of this act
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 15. NRS 598.9809 is hereby amended to read as follows:
598.9809 An agreement for the lease of a distributed
generation system must include a cover page that:
1. Prominently displays the following information at the top of
the cover page in at least 16-point font:
(a) Notice of the right to rescind or cancel the agreement,
without any penalty or obligation, within 3 business days after the
execution of the agreement, as provided in NRS 598.98216.
(b) An electronic mail address to which a notice of rescission or
cancellation may be sent pursuant to NRS 598.98216 and notice that
the lessee may send such a notice to that electronic mail address.
(c) Notice of the requirement to make and maintain a recording
pursuant to NRS 598.98213.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
(d) Notice that, before the installation of the distributed
generation system, the lessee will have the opportunity to confirm
that no representations, offers or promises were made at any time
concerning the lease of the distributed generation system other than
what is contained in the agreement.
2. Provides the following information in at least 10-point font:
(a) The amounts due at the signing for and at the completion of
the installation or any inspection of the distributed generation
system.
(b) An estimated timeline for the installation of the distributed
generation system.
(c) The estimated amount of the monthly payments due under
the lease in the first year of operation of the distributed generation
system.
(d) The length of the term of the lease.
(e) A description of any warranties.
(f) The rate of any payment increases.
(g) The identification of any state or federal tax incentives that
are included in calculating the amount of the monthly payments due
under the lease.
(h) The estimated production of the distributed generation
system in the first year of operation and an explanation that:
(1) The lessee will always receive a power bill if the
premises of the lessee are connected to the power grid;
(2) The estimated production or offset is based on available
data on prior consumption; and
(3) Any change in consumption by the lessee will impact the
estimated offset, or savings, in relation to the production.
(i) A description of the terms for renewal or any other options
available at the end of the term of the lease.
(j) A description of any option to purchase the distributed
generation system before the end of the term of the lease.
(k) Notice of the existence of the Recovery Fund administered
by the State Contractors’ Board pursuant to NRS 624.470.
(l) Notice that a person financially damaged by a licensed
contractor who performs work on a residence may be eligible to
recover certain financial damages from the Recovery Fund.
(m) Notice that a host customer may file a complaint with the
Public Utilities Commission of Nevada.
(n) Contact information for the State Contractors’ Board and the
Public Utilities Commission of Nevada, including, without
limitation, a telephone number.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
(o) Notice that the lessee, before the execution of the agreement,
may request any document used in the solicitation, offer or
transaction for the agreement in any language.
(p) The following disclosures:
(1) Whether the solar installation company:
(I) Maintains a physical office in this State at which
employees, as defined in subsection 6 of NRS 624.020, of the solar
installation company conduct business; and
(II) Has at least one motor vehicle registered in this
State;
(2) Whether the solar installation company is in
compliance with all applicable federal, state and local laws and
regulations; and
(3) Whether the person who initially presented the lessee
with the lease agreement is an employee, as defined in subsection
6 of NRS 624.020, of the solar installation company.
Sec. 16. NRS 598.9811 is hereby amended to read as follows:
598.9811 An agreement for the lease of a distributed
generation system must include, without limitation, the following
information in at least 10-point font:
1. The name, mailing address, telephone number and number
of the contractor’s license of the solar installation company.
2. The name, mailing address and telephone number of:
(a) The lessor of the distributed generation system; and
(b) The name, mailing address and telephone number of the
person responsible for all maintenance of the distributed generation
system, if different from the solar installation company.
3. An estimated timeline for the installation of the distributed
generation system.
4. The length of the term of the lease.
5. A general description of the distributed generation system.
6. The amounts due at the signing for and at the completion of
the installation or any inspection of the distributed generation
system.
7. A description of any warranties.
8. The amount of the:
(a) Monthly payments due under the lease; and
(b) Total payments due under the lease, excluding taxes.
9. A description of any other one-time or recurring charges,
including, without limitation, a description of the circumstances that
trigger any late fees.
10. A description of any obligation the lessor has regarding the
installation, repair or removal of the distributed generation system.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
11. A description of any obligation the lessor has regarding
construction of and insurance for the distributed generation system.
12. A description of any:
(a) Taxes due at the commencement of the lease; and
(b) Estimation of taxes known to be applicable during the term
of the lease, subject to any change in the state or local tax rate or tax
structure.
13. A copy of the warranty for the distributed generation
system.
14. A disclosure notifying the lessee of the transferability of
the obligations under the warranty to a subsequent lessee.
15. The identification of any state or federal tax incentives that
are included in calculating the amount of the monthly payments due
under the lease.
16. A description of the ownership of any tax credits, tax
rebates, tax incentives or portfolio energy credits in connection with
the distributed generation system.
17. Any terms for renewal of the lease.
18. A description of any option to purchase the distributed
generation system before the end of the term of the lease.
19. A description of all options available to the host customer
in connection with the continuation, termination or transfer of the
lease in the event of the:
(a) Sale of the property to which the distributed generation
system is affixed; or
(b) Death of the lessee.
20. A description of any restrictions that the lease imposes on
the modification or transfer of the property to which the distributed
generation system is affixed.
21. The granting to the lessee of the right to rescind the lease
for a period ending not less than 3 business days after the lease is
signed.
22. An estimate of the amount of electricity that could be
generated by the distributed generation system in the first year of
operation.
23. The following information concerning the parts of the
distributed generation system:
(a) The make and model of all inverters of the distributed
generation system;
(b) The make, model and power class of all solar modules of
the distributed generation system; and
(c) The manufacturer of any racking system of the distributed
generation system.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
24. A provision requiring the lessee to fully and accurately
disclose all material information relating to the property to which
the distributed generation system will be affixed that may affect
the installation of the distributed generation system, including,
without limitation, any relevant modifications to the electrical
service of the property.
25. A provision requiring the lessee to promptly execute any
agreements with a public utility that are necessary and provide to
the solar installation company any information that is necessary
for the completion of the installation of the distributed generation
system.
26. A provision that provides that the lessee is liable for any
damages caused by the failure of the purchaser to comply with the
provisions of any agreement set forth in subsection 25.
27. A signature block that is signed and dated by the lessor and
the lessee of the distributed generation system.
Sec. 17. NRS 598.9813 is hereby amended to read as follows:
598.9813 An agreement for the purchase of a distributed
generation system must include a cover page that:
1. Prominently displays the following information at the top of
the cover page in at least 16-point font:
(a) Notice of the right to rescind or cancel the agreement,
without any penalty or obligation, within 3 business days after the
execution of the agreement, as provided in NRS 598.98216.
(b) An electronic mail address to which a notice of rescission or
cancellation may be sent pursuant to NRS 598.98216 and notice that
the purchaser may send such a notice to that electronic mail address.
(c) Notice of the requirement to make and maintain a recording
pursuant to NRS 598.98213.
(d) Notice that, before the installation of the distributed
generation system, the purchaser will have the opportunity to
confirm that no representations, offers or promises were made at any
time concerning the purchase of the distributed generation system
other than what is contained in the agreement.
2. Provide the following information in at least 10-point font:
(a) The size of the distributed generation system.
(b) The length of the term of the warranty for the distributed
generation system.
(c) An estimated timeline for the installation of the distributed
generation system.
(d) A description of any warranties.
(e) The total cost of the distributed generation system.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
(f) The estimated value of any portfolio energy credits and
rebates of any incentives included in the calculation of the total cost
of the distributed generation system.
(g) The amounts due at the signing for and at the completion of
the installation of the distributed generation system.
(h) The estimated production of the distributed generation
system in the first year of operation and an explanation that:
(1) The purchaser will always receive a power bill if the
premises of the purchaser are connected to the power grid;
(2) The estimated production or offset is based on available
data on prior consumption; and
(3) Any change in consumption by the purchaser will impact
the estimated offset, or savings, in relation to the production.
(i) Notice of the existence of the Recovery Fund administered
by the State Contractors’ Board pursuant to NRS 624.470.
(j) Notice that a person financially damaged by a licensed
contractor who performs work on a residence may be eligible to
recover certain financial damages from the Recovery Fund.
(k) Notice that a host customer may file a complaint with the
Public Utilities Commission of Nevada.
(l) Contact information for the State Contractors’ Board and
Public Utilities Commission of Nevada, including, without
limitation, a telephone number.
(m) Notice that the purchaser, before the execution of the
agreement, may request any document used in the solicitation, offer
or transaction for the agreement in any language.
(n) The following disclosures:
(1) Whether the solar installation company:
(I) Maintains a physical office in this State at which
employees, as defined in subsection 6 of NRS 624.020, of the solar
installation company conduct business; and
(II) Has at least one motor vehicle registered in this
State;
(2) Whether the solar installation company is in
compliance with all applicable federal, state and local laws and
regulations; and
(3) Whether the person who initially presented the
purchaser with the purchase agreement is an employee, as defined
in subsection 6 of NRS 624.020, of the solar installation company.
Sec. 18. NRS 598.9814 is hereby amended to read as follows:
598.9814 An agreement for the purchase of a distributed
generation system must include, without limitation, the following
information in at least 10-point font:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
1. The name, mailing address, telephone number, electronic
mail address and number of the contractor’s license of the solar
installation company.
2. The name, mailing address, telephone number and electronic
mail address of:
(a) The purchaser of the distributed generation system; and
(b) The name, mailing address, telephone number and electronic
mail address of the person responsible for all maintenance of the
distributed generation system, if different from the solar installation
company.
3. A description, which includes, without limitation, any
assumptions, concerning the design and installation of the
distributed generation system. Such a description must include,
without limitation:
(a) The size of the distributed generation system;
(b) The estimated amount of production for the distributed
generation system in the first year of operation; and
(c) The estimated annual degradation to the distributed
generation system.
4. The total cost of the distributed generation system.
5. An estimated timeline for the installation of the distributed
generation system.
6. A payment schedule, including, without limitation:
(a) The due dates for any deposit; and
(b) Any subsequent payments that are not to exceed the total
system cost stated on the cover page pursuant to NRS 598.9813.
7. The granting to the purchaser the right to rescind the
agreement for a period ending not less than 3 business days after the
agreement is signed.
8. A copy of the warranty for the distributed generation system.
9. A disclosure notifying the purchaser of the transferability of
the obligations under the warranty to a subsequent purchaser.
10. The identification of any incentives included in the
calculation of the total cost of the distributed generation system.
11. A description of any guarantee of the performance of the
distributed generation system.
12. The following information concerning the parts of the
distributed generation system:
(a) The make and model of all inverters of the distributed
generation system;
(b) The make, model and power class of the solar modules of
the distributed generation system; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
(c) The manufacturer of any racking system of the distributed
generation system.
13. A provision requiring the purchaser to fully and
accurately disclose all material information relating to the
property to which the distributed generation system will be affixed
that may affect the installation of the distributed generation
system, including, without limitation, any relevant modifications to
the electrical service of the property.
14. A provision requiring the purchaser to promptly execute
any agreements with a public utility that are necessary and provide
to the solar installation company any information that is necessary
for the completion of the installation of the distributed generation
system.
15. A provision that provides that the purchaser is liable for
any damages caused by the failure of the purchaser to comply with
the provisions of any agreement set forth in subsection 14.
16. A signature block that is signed and dated by the purchaser
of the distributed generation system and the solar installation
company.
[13.] 17. A description of the basis for any estimates of
savings that were provided to the purchaser, if applicable.
[14.] 18. A disclosure concerning the retention of any portfolio
energy credits, if applicable.
Sec. 19. NRS 598.9816 is hereby amended to read as follows:
598.9816 A power purchase agreement for the sale of the
output of a distributed generation system must include a cover page
that:
1. Prominently displays the following information at the top of
the cover page in at least 16-point font:
(a) Notice of the right to rescind or cancel the agreement,
without any penalty or obligation, within 3 business days after the
execution of the agreement, as provided in NRS 598.98216.
(b) An electronic mail address to which a notice of rescission or
cancellation may be sent pursuant to NRS 598.98216 and notice that
the host customer may send such a notice to that electronic mail
address.
(c) Notice of the requirement to make and maintain a recording
pursuant to NRS 598.98213.
(d) Notice that, before the installation of the distributed
generation system, the host customer will have the opportunity to
confirm that no representations, offers or promises were made at any
time concerning the sale of the output of the distributed generation
system other than what is contained in the agreement.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 15 –
2. Provides the following information in at least 10-point font:
(a) The rate of any increase in the payments to be made during
the term of the agreement and, if applicable, the date of the first
such increase.
(b) An estimated timeline for the installation of the distributed
generation system.
(c) The rate of electricity per kilowatt-hour of electricity for the
first year of the agreement.
(d) The length of the term of the agreement.
(e) The amounts due at the signing for and at the completion of
the installation or any inspection of the distributed generation
system.
(f) The estimated production of the distributed generation
system in the first year of operation and an explanation that:
(1) The host customer will always receive a power bill if the
premises of the host customer are connected to the power grid;
(2) The estimated production or offset is based on available
data on prior consumption; and
(3) Any change in consumption by the host customer will
impact the estimated offset, or savings, in relation to the production.
(g) A description of the options available at the end of the term
of the agreement.
(h) A description of any option to purchase the distributed
generation system before the end of the term of the agreement.
(i) Notice of the existence of the Recovery Fund administered
by the State Contractors’ Board pursuant to NRS 624.470.
(j) Notice that a person financially damaged by a licensed
contractor who performs work on a residence may be eligible to
recover certain financial damages from the Recovery Fund.
(k) Notice that a host customer may file a complaint with the
Public Utilities Commission of Nevada.
(l) Contact information for the State Contractors’ Board and the
Public Utilities Commission of Nevada, including, without
limitation, a telephone number.
(m) Notice that the host customer, before execution of the
agreement, may request any document used in the solicitation, offer
or transaction for the power purchase agreement in any language.
(n) The following disclosures:
(1) Whether the solar installation company:
(I) Maintains a physical office in this State at which
employees, as defined in subsection 6 of NRS 624.020, of the solar
installation company conduct business; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 16 –
(II) Has at least one motor vehicle registered in this
State;
(2) Whether the solar installation company is in
compliance with all applicable federal, state and local laws and
regulations; and
(3) Whether the person who initially presented the host
customer with the power purchase agreement is an employee, as
defined in subsection 6 of NRS 624.020, of the solar installation
company.
Sec. 20. NRS 598.9817 is hereby amended to read as follows:
598.9817 A power purchase agreement for the sale of the
output of a distributed generation system must include, without
limitation, the following information in at least 10-point font:
1. The name, mailing address, telephone number, electronic
mail address and number of the contractor’s license of the solar
installation company.
2. The name, mailing address, telephone number and electronic
mail address of:
(a) The provider of the distributed generation system; and
(b) The name, mailing address, telephone number and electronic
mail address of the person responsible for all maintenance of the
distributed generation system, if different from the solar installation
company.
3. The length of the term of the agreement.
4. An estimated timeline for the installation of the distributed
generation system.
5. The payments made during the first year of the agreement
for the price of electricity, which includes, without limitation, the
price per kilowatt-hour of electricity and the price per monthly
system electrical output.
6. The estimated annual electrical output of the distributed
generation system.
7. The rate of any increase in the payments to be made during
the term of the agreement and, if applicable, the date of the first
such increase.
8. A description of any obligation the solar installation
company has regarding construction and repair of and insurance for
the distributed generation system.
9. A description of any one-time or recurring fees, including,
without limitation, a description of the circumstances that trigger
any late fees.
10. A description of any:
(a) Taxes due at the commencement of the agreement; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 17 –
(b) Estimation of taxes known to be applicable during the term
of the agreement, subject to a change in the state or local tax rate or
tax structure.
11. A copy of the warranty for the distributed generation
system.
12. A description of the ownership of any tax credits, tax
rebates, tax incentives or portfolio energy credits in connection with
the distributed generation system.
13. Any terms for renewal of the agreement.
14. A description of any option to purchase the distributed
generation system before the end of the term of the agreement.
15. A description of all options available to the host customer
in connection with the continuation, termination or transfer of the
agreement in the event of the:
(a) Sale of the property to which the distributed generation
system is affixed; or
(b) Death of the purchaser.
16. The granting to the purchaser of the right to rescind the
agreement for a period ending not less than 3 business days after the
agreement is signed.
17. A description of any restrictions that the agreement
imposes on the modification or transfer of the property to which the
distributed generation system is affixed.
18. A description of any guarantees of the performance of the
distributed generation system.
19. A disclosure notifying the host customer of the
transferability of the obligations under the warranty to a subsequent
purchaser.
20. The following information concerning the parts of the
distributed generation system:
(a) The make and model of all inverters of the distributed
generation system;
(b) The make, model and power class of the solar modules of
the distributed generation system; and
(c) The manufacturer of any racking system of the distributed
generation system.
21. A provision requiring the host customer to fully and
accurately disclose all material information relating to the
property to which the distributed generation system will be affixed
that may affect the installation of the distributed generation
system, including, without limitation, any relevant modifications to
the electrical service of the property.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 18 –
22. A provision requiring the host customer to promptly
execute any agreements with a public utility that are necessary
and provide to the solar installation company any information that
is necessary for the completion of the installation of the distributed
generation system.
23. A provision that provides that the host customer is liable
for any damages caused by the failure of the purchaser to comply
with the provisions of any agreement set forth in subsection 22.
24. A signature block that is signed and dated by the purchaser
and the solar installation company.
[21.] 25. A statement describing the due dates of any
payments.
Sec. 21. NRS 598.98213 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
598.98213 1. A solar installation company shall, in person or
by telephone or videoconference, verbally:
(a) Confirm the identity of a purchaser or lessee under an
agreement for the purchase or lease of a distributed generation
system or a host customer under a power purchase agreement;
(b) Communicate to the purchaser, lessee or host customer the
information required to be included in a cover page pursuant to NRS
598.9809, 598.9813 or 598.9816, as applicable; and
(c) Confirm that the purchaser, lessee or host customer
understands the information communicated pursuant to
paragraph (b).
2. The verbal communication required by subsection 1 must
be:
(a) Recorded by the solar installation company; and
(b) Conducted at the time of the execution of the agreement or
within 48 hours after the execution of the agreement.
3. A solar installation company shall not commence the
installation of any distributed generation system under an agreement
until the recording required pursuant to this section has been made.
4. A solar installation company shall maintain the recording
required pursuant to this section for not less than 4 years after the
date of the final inspection of the distributed generation system
within the jurisdiction in which the distributed generation system is
located. If, at any time during that period:
(a) A purchaser, lessee, host customer or distributed
generation system financier requests, in an electronic
communication or in writing pursuant to the terms of the power
purchase agreement, as applicable; or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 19 –
(b) The Attorney General, the Division of Financial
Institutions of the Department of Business and Industry, the State
Contractors’ Board, the Housing Division of the Department of
Business and Industry or a law enforcement agency requests, in
any manner,
 that a copy of the recording be provided to the requesting
person or entity, as applicable, the solar installation company
shall provide the copy within 10 business days after receipt of the
request. If a solar installation company fails to provide the copy
within that time, the purchase or lease agreement or power
purchase agreement is voidable by the purchaser, lessee or host
customer, as applicable.
5. A solar installation company shall, before the
commencement of the installation of a distributed generation
system, submit proof to the purchaser, lessee or host customer that
the solar installation company is properly licensed.
Sec. 21.5. NRS 598.9822 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
598.9822 1. A host customer may file a complaint
concerning a solar installation company with the Public Utilities
Commission of Nevada. Upon receipt of a complaint, the
Commission may direct the host customer to the appropriate agency
or person to resolve the complaint.
2. The failure of a person to comply with NRS 598.9801 to
598.9822, inclusive, and sections 14.1 to 14.4, inclusive, of this act
constitutes a deceptive trade practice for the purposes of NRS
598.0903 to 598.0999, inclusive.
3. If a solar installation company executes with a purchaser or
lessee an agreement for the purchase or lease of a distributed
generation system or with a host customer a power purchase
agreement and knowingly fails to comply with any requirement of
NRS 598.9801 to 598.9822, inclusive, and sections 14.1 to 14.4,
inclusive, of this act, including, without limitation, by failing to
include any disclosure or information required by NRS 598.9801 to
598.9822, inclusive, and sections 14.1 to 14.4, inclusive, of this act,
or knowingly failing to maintain a recording of a verbal
communication as required by NRS 598.98213, the agreement is
voidable by the purchaser, lessee or host customer. The actions of
persons who solely conduct administrative duties or provide
administrative services directly to and for the benefit of the solar
installation company are not imputed to the solar installation
company for the purposes of this subsection.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 20 –
4. A violation of any provision of NRS 598.9801 to 598.9822,
inclusive, and sections 14.1 to 14.4, inclusive, of this act constitutes
consumer fraud for the purposes of NRS 41.600.
5. Any document described in NRS 598.9809 to 598.9821,
inclusive, and sections 14.1 to 14.4, inclusive, of this act must be
provided in:
(a) English; or
(b) Any other language, if any person so requests before the
execution of the relevant document.
6. If a solar installation company advertises its services or
negotiates orally or in writing any of the requirements of NRS
598.9801 to 598.9822, inclusive, and sections 14.1 to 14.4,
inclusive, of this act in a language other than English or permits an
employee or agent of the solar installation company to so advertise
or negotiate, the solar installation company must deliver a
translation of any contract, agreement or notice described in NRS
598.9801 to 598.9822, inclusive, and sections 14.1 to 14.4,
inclusive, of this act resulting from such advertising or negotiations
in the language in which such advertising was made or such
negotiations occurred to a person who is a party to such a contract or
agreement, or who may sign the contract or agreement, or who is
entitled to receive such notice. The translation of the contract,
agreement or notice must be provided before the execution of the
contract or agreement and include, without limitation, every term
and condition in the contract, agreement or notice.
Sec. 22. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 23. Chapter 704 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 24 and 25 of this act.
Sec. 24. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 25. 1. If a customer-generator has received all the
necessary inspections from any governmental entity required for
the installation of a net metering system and submits to a utility a
request for the completion of a final inspection by the utility, the
utility shall complete the final inspection within a reasonable time
after receipt of the request in accordance with the regulations
adopted pursuant to NRS 704.773.
2. If a customer-generator submits to a utility a request to
temporarily disconnect and subsequently reconnect electric service
in relation to the installation of a net metering system, the utility
shall schedule the temporary disconnection and subsequent
reconnection within a reasonable time after receiving the request
in accordance with the regulations adopted pursuant to
NRS 704.773.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 21 –
Sec. 26. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 27. NRS 704.767 is hereby amended to read as follows:
704.767 As used in NRS 704.766 to 704.776, inclusive, and
section 25 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, the
words and terms defined in NRS 704.7675 to 704.772, inclusive,
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 28. NRS 704.773 is hereby amended to read as follows:
704.773 1. A utility shall offer net metering in accordance
with the provisions of NRS 704.766 to 704.776, inclusive, and
section 25 of this act to the customer-generators operating within its
service area.
2. If the net metering system of a customer-generator who
accepts the offer of a utility for net metering has a capacity of not
more than 25 kilowatts, the utility:
(a) Shall offer to make available to the customer-generator an
energy meter that is capable of registering the flow of electricity in
two directions.
(b) May, at its own expense and with the written consent of the
customer-generator, install one or more additional meters to monitor
the flow of electricity in each direction.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, shall not
charge the customer-generator any fee or charge that is different
than that charged to other customers of the utility in the rate class to
which the customer-generator would belong if the customer-
generator did not have a net metering system.
(d) Shall not reduce the minimum monthly charge of the
customer-generator based on the electricity generated by the
customer-generator and fed back to the utility.
3. If the net metering system of a customer-generator who
accepts the offer of a utility for net metering has a capacity of more
than 25 kilowatts, the utility:
(a) May require the customer-generator to install at its own cost:
(1) An energy meter that is capable of measuring generation
output and customer load; and
(2) Any upgrades to the system of the utility that are required
to make the net metering system compatible with the system of the
utility.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (d) and
subsection 7, shall not charge the customer-generator any fee or
charge that is different than that charged to other customers of the
utility in the rate class to which the customer-generator would
belong if the customer-generator did not have a net metering system,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 22 –
including, without limitation, customer, demand and facility
charges.
(c) Shall not reduce the minimum monthly charge of the
customer-generator based on the electricity generated by the
customer-generator and fed back to the utility.
(d) Shall not charge the customer-generator any standby charge.
4. At the time of installation or upgrade of any portion of a net
metering system, the utility must allow a customer-generator
governed by subsection 3 to pay the entire cost of the installation or
upgrade of the portion of the net metering system.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2, 3 and 6 and
NRS 704.7732, the utility shall not for any purpose assign a
customer-generator to a rate class other than the rate class to which
the customer-generator would belong if the customer-generator did
not have a net metering system, including, without limitation, for the
purpose of any fee or charge.
6. If the net metering system of a customer-generator is a net
metering system described in paragraph (b) or (c) of subsection 1 of
NRS 704.771 and:
(a) The system is intended primarily to offset part or all of the
customer-generator’s requirements for electricity on property
contiguous to the property on which the net metering system is
located; and
(b) The customer-generator sells or transfers his or her interest
in the contiguous property,
 the net metering system ceases to be eligible to participate in net
metering.
7. A utility shall assess against a customer-generator:
(a) If applicable, the universal energy charge imposed pursuant
to NRS 702.160; and
(b) Any charges imposed pursuant to chapter 701B of NRS or
NRS 704.7827 or 704.785 which are assessed against other
customers in the same rate class as the customer-generator.
 For any such charges calculated on the basis of a kilowatt-hour
rate, the customer-generator must only be charged with respect to
kilowatt-hours of energy delivered by the utility to the
customer-generator.
8. The Commission and the utility must allow a customer-
generator who accepts the offer of the utility for net metering to
continue net metering pursuant to NRS 704.766 to 704.776,
inclusive, at the location at which the net metering system is
originally installed for 20 years. For the purposes of this subsection,
“to continue net metering” includes, without limitation:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 23 –
(a) Retaining the percentage set forth in subsection 3 of NRS
704.7732 to be used to determine the credit for electricity governed
by paragraph (c) of subsection 2 of NRS 704.775, which is
applicable to the customer-generator; and
(b) Replacing the originally installed net metering system, as
needed, at any time before 20 years after the date of the installation
of the originally installed net metering system.
9. The Commission shall adopt regulations prescribing the
form and substance for a net metering tariff and a standard net
metering contract. The regulations must include, without limitation:
(a) The particular provisions, limitations and responsibilities of
a customer-generator which must be included in a net metering tariff
with regard to:
(1) Metering equipment;
(2) Net energy metering and billing; and
(3) Interconnection,
 based on the allowable size of the net metering system.
(b) The particular provisions, limitations and responsibilities of
a customer-generator and the utility which must be included in a
standard net metering contract.
(c) [A timeline for processing applications and contracts for net
metering applicants.] Procedures and requirements concerning the
process for applying for and installing a net metering system,
which must include, without limitation:
(1) Reasonable and appropriate timelines for the process,
including, without limitation, timelines for:
(I) The review of an application of a net metering
applicant;
(II) Obtaining a final inspection of a net metering
system;
(III) The processing of a request to temporarily
disconnect and subsequently reconnect electric service in relation
to the installation of a net metering system; and
(IV) Obtaining the permission of the utility to operate
the net metering system.
(2) The requirement that a utility that denies the
application of a net metering applicant provide to the net metering
applicant a notice detailing the reasons for the denial.
(d) Any other provisions the Commission finds necessary to
carry out the provisions of NRS 704.766 to 704.776, inclusive [.] ,
and section 25 of this act.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 24 –
Sec. 29. NRS 704.774 is hereby amended to read as follows:
704.774 1. A customer-generator must obtain all necessary
permits and approvals required by any governmental entity for the
installation of his or her net metering system and install the net
metering system in compliance with the permits and approvals.
2. A net metering system used by a customer-generator must
meet all applicable safety and power quality standards established
by:
(a) The National Electrical Code;
(b) Underwriters Laboratories Inc.; and
(c) The Institute of Electrical and Electronic Engineers.
[2.] 3. A customer-generator who satisfies the requirements
in subsection 1 and whose net metering system meets [such] the
safety and quality standards specified in subsection 2 must not be
required by the utility to:
(a) Comply with additional standards or requirements;
(b) Perform additional tests;
(c) Install additional controls; or
(d) Purchase additional liability insurance,
 arising solely from the status as a customer-generator.
Sec. 30. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 29, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On October 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)